Alaska statutes. Title 11. Criminal Law.
Chapter 05. Punishment.

Secs. 11.05.010 — 11.05.060.
Punishments and sentences.
[Repealed, § 21 ch 166 SLA 1978.
For current law on attempt, see
AS 11.31; for current sentencing provisions, see
AS 12.55.]

Secs. 11.05.070 — 11.05.090.
[Renumbered as AS 33.30.310, 33.30.320, and 33.30.300.]

Sec. 11.05.100.
Computation and execution of jail sentences.
[Repealed, § 21 ch 166 SLA 1978.
For current sentencing provisions, see AS 12.55.]

Secs. 11.05.110 — 11.05.120.
Employment of imprisoned persons. [Repealed, § 6 ch 53 SLA 1982. For current law, see AS 33.30.191.]

Sec. 11.05.130.
[Renumbered as AS 33.30.290.]

Secs. 11.05.140 — 11.05.150.
Imposition of punishment; punishment for felonies.
[Repealed, § 21 ch 166 SLA 1978.
For current sentencing provisions, see AS 12.55.]